North Dakota, session 69, SB2368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 4.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Grasslands grazing grant program.
1. The agriculture commissioner shall administer a grasslands grazing grant program to provide
grants to organizations representing cooperative grazing associations in the state .
2. a. An organization that receives a grant under this program may distribute the funding to
cooperative grazing associations for eligible infrastructure projects, which must be
located on national grasslands within the state.
b. Eligible infrastructure projects include:
(1) Water development.
(2) Fencing.
(3) Conservation initiatives.
(4) Compliance with federal permitting requirements, including fees for professional
services.
(5) Other projects to enhance wildlife habitat, capture carbon, or increase the health of
grasslands.
c. Program participants shall develop and implement a grazing land plan in compliance with
local soil conservation district guidance, and the plan must be approved by the local soil
conservation district.
3. To be eligible for a grant, an organization shall provide one dollar of matching funds from
nonstate sources for every four dollars of grant funding. The agriculture commissioner shall
establish additional guidelines for the program.

S. B. NO. 2368 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2368.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 84 Nays 8 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State